District of Columbia statutes.
9-1105.02

Appropriations authorized.

The cost of designing, engineering, constructing, and equipping the facilities of the adopted regional system (as defined in § 9-1111.01(1)) shall be financed in part by the federal and District of Columbia governments, as follows:

(1)

To finance the United States portion there is hereby authorized to be appropriated to the Authority an amount not to exceed $100,000,000, which shall remain available until expended;

(2)

To finance the District of Columbia portion there is hereby authorized to be appropriated to the Authority out of the General Fund of the District of Columbia an amount not to exceed $50,000,000, which shall remain available until expended.

History

Sept. 8, 1965, 79 Stat. 665, Pub. L. 89-173, § 5(a)
Dec. 9, 1969, 83 Stat. 323, Pub. L. 91-143, § 8(b)

Cross References

Persons displaced by programs and projects of Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, eligibility for relocation payments and assistance, see § 6-333.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-1107.09, § 9-1111.02, and § 9-1111.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2422.
1973 Ed., § 1-1424.